Alaska statutes. Title 35. Public Buildings, Works, and Improvements.
Chapter 40. Names of Public Works.

Cross references. —

For provision that certain highways may be given names only by law, see AS

19.10.085

.

Sec. 35.40.001.
Bob Reeve Boulevard.

The Elmendorf By-Pass Highway is named the Bob Reeve Boulevard.

History.

(§ 2 ch 52 SLA 1982)

Sec. 35.40.005.
Klondike Highway.

The Alaska portion of the highway between Skagway, Alaska and Whitehorse, Yukon Territory, Canada is named the Klondike Highway.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 1982)

Sec. 35.40.010.
E. L. Patton Bridge.

The bridge spanning the Yukon River at the southern terminus of the James Dalton Highway is named the E. L. Patton Bridge.

History.

(§ 2 ch 19 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 20 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 19.40.085. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 35.40.015.
Douglas Bridge.

The bridge across the Gastineau Channel connecting Juneau with Douglas Island is named the Douglas Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

19.10.300

.
Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 35.40.020.
Brenwick/Craig Road.

Klutina Road near Copper Center is renamed Brenwick/Craig Road.

History.

(§ 1 ch 57 SLA 1984)

Sec. 35.40.025.
Gateway to the Wood-Tikchik State Park.

The road from Dillingham to Aleknagik is designated the Gateway to the Wood-Tikchik State Park.

History.

(§ 2 ch 30 SLA 1985)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose, see § 1, ch. 30, SLA 1985 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 35.40.030.
Woodrow Johansen Expressway.

In Fairbanks, the controlled access highway connecting the Geist Road at University Avenue and the Steese Highway interchange is named the Woodrow Johansen Expressway.

History.

(§ 2 ch 33 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings, see sec. 1, ch. 33, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 35.40.035.
Veterans’ memorials.

In Anchorage, the Glenn Highway from mile 0 to mile 9 is designated the Veterans’ Memorial Parkway.

In Fairbanks, the bridge to be built across the Chena River at Barnette Street, is named the Veterans’ Memorial Bridge.

In Juneau, the Glacier Highway from Auke Bay (mile 12) to Echo Cove (mile 39) is designated the Juneau Veterans’ Memorial Highway.

In Eagle River, the portion of the Eagle River Loop Road between the Anchorage Regional Landfill and Old Glenn Highway is concurrently designated as the Eagle River Veterans’ Memorial Highway.

The bridge on the Sterling Highway that crosses the Kenai River at Soldotna is named the David Douthit Veterans’ Memorial Bridge.

In the Matanuska-Susitna Valley, the road known as Seldon Road, East Colony Schools Drive, and that portion of the road known as Bogard Road that extends east and west between Palmer and Meadow Lakes, including the road extension to be constructed on the west end of Seldon Road and the extension to be constructed on the east end of Bogard Road, are renamed Veterans’ Way. This subsection does not apply to that portion of Bogard Road that extends from the intersection of East Grumman Circle to Main Street.

Bridge numbers 1124 and 1889 spanning the Matanuska River northbound and southbound at mile 30.4 of the Glenn Highway are named the Vietnam Helicopter Pilots’ Memorial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective November 26, 2021, added (g).

Sec. 35.40.040.
Robert J. Mitchell Expressway.

The South Fairbanks Expressway from the Parks Highway and Airport Road interchange to the Richardson Highway is named the Robert J. Mitchell Expressway.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1989)

Sec. 35.40.045.
Crabbie’s Crossing.

Bridge number 694 at milepost 231.2 on the George Parks Highway is named Crabbie’s Crossing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1989)

Sec. 35.40.050.
Ralph M. Bartholomew Veterans’ Memorial Bridge.

The bridge to be built across Tongass Narrows to Gravina Island shall be named the Ralph M. Bartholomew Veterans’ Memorial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1998)

Sec. 35.40.053.
Joseph C. Williams, Sr., Coastal Trail.

The bike path adjacent to the South Tongass Highway is named the Joseph C. Williams, Sr., Coastal Trail.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 2009)

Sec. 35.40.055.
Clint Starnes Memorial Bridge.

The bridge over the Swanson River in the Captain Cook Park area is named the Clint Starnes Memorial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1989)

Sec. 35.40.060.
Charles E. Carney Memorial Bridge.

The bridge over the Little Susitna River on North Shushana Drive in the Matanuska-Susitna Borough is named the Charles E. Carney Memorial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1989)

Sec. 35.40.065.
Chief Eddie Hoffman Road.

The Bethel Airport road is named the Chief Eddie Hoffman Road.

History.

(§ 2 ch 86 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.035

.
Renumbered in 1989.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 86, SLA 1989 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 35.40.070.
Bob Blodgett Nome-Teller Highway.

The road connecting Nome and Teller is named the Bob Blodgett Nome-Teller Highway.

History.

(§ 1 ch 8 SLA 1991)

Sec. 35.40.075.
Ina Johnston Bridge.

Bridge number 1192 on Edgerton Park Road over the Little Susitna River is named Ina Johnston Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 8 SLA 1991)

Sec. 35.40.080.
Briggs Bridge.

Bridge number 1739 on Eagle River Loop Road over the Eagle River is named the Briggs Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 124 SLA 1992)

Sec. 35.40.082.
Sergeant James Bondsteel Bridge of Honor.

Bridge number 1121, across the Knik River in this state, is named the Sergeant James Bondsteel Bridge of Honor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 13 SLA 2002)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for the bill (SB 269) that became ch. 13, SLA 2002, see 2002 Senate Journal 2088.

Sec. 35.40.085.
Black Veterans Recognition Bridge.

Bridge number 503 on the Alaska Highway over the Gerstle River at milepost 1392 is named the Black Veterans Recognition Bridge.

History.

(§ 2 ch 42 SLA 1993)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose in enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 42, SLA 1993 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 35.40.090.
Manvil H. Olson Bridge.

Bridge number 1030 off Schrock Road over the Little Susitna River is named the Manvil H. Olson Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 19 SLA 1994)

Sec. 35.40.095.
Mountain View Road.

State Route 296308 in Gustavus between the junction with the Good River Road and the boundary of the Glacier Bay National Park is named Mountain View Road.

History.

(§ 1 ch 7 SLA 1997)

Sec. 35.40.100.
George W. Palmer Memorial Bridge.

Bridge number 1951 on the Old Glenn Highway over the Matanuska River is named the George W. Palmer Memorial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1997)

Sec. 35.40.105.
East Egan Drive.

That portion of the Richardson Highway in Valdez between the intersection with Meals Avenue and the east intersection with Mineral Creek Loop Road is renamed East Egan Drive.

History.

(§ 1 ch 111 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.100

. Renumbered in 1997.

Sec. 35.40.110.
Robert B. Atwood Building.

The state office building at 550 West Seventh Avenue in Anchorage is named the Robert B. Atwood Building.

History.

(§ 1 ch 3 SLA 1998; am § 23 ch 9 SLA 2013)

Sec. 35.40.112.
Willard E. Dunham Residence Hall.

The Alaska Vocational Technical Center building at 516 Third Avenue in Seward is named the Willard E. Dunham Residence Hall.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 28, SLA 2019, which enacted this section, took effect on December 26, 2019.

Sec. 35.40.113.
Daniel R. Fauske Building.

The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation building at 4300 Boniface Parkway in Anchorage is named the Daniel R. Fauske Building.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 2017)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as
AS 35.40.380; renumbered in 2017.

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 2, SLA 2017, which enacted this section, took effect July 7, 2017.

Sec. 35.40.115.
Herman Leirer Road.

Exit Glacier Road off the Seward Highway near Seward is renamed Herman Leirer Road.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.110

.
Renumbered in 1998.

Sec. 35.40.120.
State Trooper Bruce A. Heck Memorial Corridor.

The portion of the Glenn Highway between milepost 128 and milepost 189 is concurrently designated as the State Trooper Bruce A. Heck Memorial Corridor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 24 SLA 1999)

Sec. 35.40.125.
Terry Miller Legislative Office Building.

The building in Juneau known as Capital School is named the Terry Miller Legislative Office Building.

History.

(§ 1 ch 16 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.120

. Renumbered in 1999.

Sec. 35.40.130.
Ted Stevens Anchorage International Airport.

The state-owned and state-operated international airport at Anchorage is named the Ted Stevens Anchorage International Airport.

History.

(§ 1 ch 16 SLA 2000)

Sec. 35.40.135.
Alaska Native Veterans’ Honor Bridge.

The bridge over the Tanana River at mile 305 of the George Parks Highway is named the Alaska Native Veterans’ Honor Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.130

.
Renumbered in 2000.

Sec. 35.40.140.
Joe Redington, Sr., Memorial Trail.

The portion of the Knik-Goose Bay Road in the Matanuska-Susitna Borough between milepost 0 and milepost 15 is concurrently designated as the Joe Redington, Sr., Memorial Trail.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 2001)

Sec. 35.40.145.
Fred Zharoff Memorial Bridge.

The Near Island Bridge in Kodiak is named the Fred Zharoff Memorial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.140

. Renumbered in 2001.

Sec. 35.40.150.
Trooper Hans-Peter Lothar Roelle Memorial Weigh Station.

The northbound weigh station at mile 10.6 of the Glenn Highway is named the Trooper Hans-Peter Lothar Roelle Memorial Weigh Station.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 2002)

Sec. 35.40.155.
Officer Justin Todd Wollam Memorial Bike Trail.

The Glenn Highway bike trail is named the Officer Justin Todd Wollam Memorial Bike Trail.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 2002)

Sec. 35.40.160.
Mail Carrier Emil Wegner Memorial Corridor.

The portion of the Richardson Highway between milepost 10 and milepost 57 is concurrently designated as the Mail Carrier Emil Wegner Memorial Corridor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 2002)

Sec. 35.40.165.
Wendy Ann Cogdell Memorial Rest Area.

The rest area on the Officer Justin Todd Wollam Memorial Bike Trail located near mile 8.7 of the Glenn Highway is named the Wendy Ann Cogdell Memorial Rest Area. A memorial monument may be placed in the rest area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 2002)

Sec. 35.40.170.
Katelyn Ohmer Markley Bridge.

Bridge number 388 over Ohmer Creek at mile 20.2 on the Mitkof Highway south of Petersburg is named the Katelyn Ohmer Markley Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 2002)

Sec. 35.40.175.
William Ransom Wood Centennial Bridge.

Bridge number 1995 over the Chena River in Fairbanks is named the William Ransom Wood Centennial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 5 SLA 2003)

Sec. 35.40.180.
Tom Madsen Airport.

The state airport at the City of Unalaska is named the Tom Madsen Airport.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.150

. Renumbered in 2002.

Sec. 35.40.185.
Sven Haakanson, Sr., Airport.

The state airport at Old Harbor is named the Sven Haakanson, Sr., Airport.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.175

. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 35.40.190.
Jack Coghill Bridge to the Interior.

Bridge number 216 over the Nenana River at Rex is named the Jack Coghill Bridge to the Interior.

History.

(§ 1 ch 7 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.185

. Renumbered in 2004.

Sec. 35.40.195.
Charles Gamble Jr. — Donald Sperl Joint Use Facility.

The joint use student recreation center and National Guard readiness center built for the University of Alaska Southeast and the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs at Juneau is named the Charles Gamble Jr. — Donald Sperl Joint Use Facility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 2005)

Sec. 35.40.200.
Ruth Burnett Sport Fish Hatchery.

The sport fish hatchery to be built in Fairbanks shall be named the Ruth Burnett Sport Fish Hatchery.

History.

(§ 1 ch 93 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.195

; renumbered in 2005.

Sec. 35.40.205.
Linny Pacillo Parking Garage.

The state parking garage being constructed in Anchorage north of the Robert B. Atwood Building is named the Linny Pacillo Parking Garage. The name of the facility honors Linny Pacillo, one of the original Anchorage “parking fairies,” who served the community as an agent of change through small acts of purposeful altruism.

History.

(§ 1 ch 60 SLA 2007)

Sec. 35.40.210.
Purple Heart Trail.

The Alaska Highway from the Alaska-Canada border to Delta Junction and the Richardson Highway between Delta Junction and Fairbanks are concurrently designated the Purple Heart Trail.

The department shall erect and maintain appropriate signs facing the oncoming traffic in both directions entering the highway at Fairbanks, Delta Junction, Tok Junction, the Alaska border, and at points approximately halfway between those locations designating the highways described in (a) of this section as the Purple Heart Trail. Each sign must

display a replica of the Purple Heart Medal;

contain the following statement: “Purple Heart Trail.”

At not fewer than three pullouts along the Purple Heart Trail, selected by the commissioner, the department shall erect informational displays including

a replica of the Purple Heart Medal;

the following statement: “Purple Heart Trail”;

information pertinent to the Purple Heart Medal and Purple Heart Trail and their history.

The department shall determine the appropriate size for the signs to be erected under (b) of this section and informational displays described in (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 2008; am §§ 24 — 26 ch 9 SLA 2013)

Sec. 35.40.213.
Sam Schuyler Memorial Bridge.

The bridge to be built on the Dalton Highway at approximately milepost 308 shall be named the Sam Schuyler Memorial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 2010)

Sec. 35.40.215.
Shirley Demientieff Memorial Bridge.

The bridge over the Tanana River on the George Parks Highway directly north of the Alaska Native Veterans’ Honor Bridge is named the Shirley Demientieff Memorial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 54 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

35.40.210

; renumbered in 2008.

Sec. 35.40.220.
Thomas B. Stewart Legislative Office Building.

The Capitol Annex in Juneau known as the Scottish Rite Temple is named the Thomas B. Stewart Legislative Office Building.

The legislative council shall prepare and install an appropriate plaque dedicating the Thomas B. Stewart Legislative Office Building in memory of the Honorable Thomas B. Stewart.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Thomas B. Stewart was the Secretary of the Alaska Constitutional Convention, a legislator, and a Superior Court Judge.

Sec. 35.40.225.
William Jack Hernandez Sport Fish Hatchery.

The state fish hatchery under construction on the Elmendorf Air Force Base in Anchorage scheduled to be completed in May 2011 is named the William Jack Hernandez Sport Fish Hatchery.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 2010)

Sec. 35.40.227.
Louis Miller Bridge.

The bridge over Hammer Slough on Nordic Drive in Petersburg is named the Louis Miller Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.225

, renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 35.40.230.
Richard “Dewey” Duvall Ferry Terminal.

The South Mitkof Island ferry terminal is named the Richard “Dewey” Duvall Ferry Terminal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 106 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.225

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 35.40.235.
Walter L. Kubley Ketchikan Ferry Terminal.

The Ketchikan ferry terminal is named the Walter L. Kubley Ketchikan Ferry Terminal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 2011)

Sec. 35.40.240.
Frank Palmer Auke Bay Ferry Terminal.

The ferry terminal located at Auke Bay in Juneau is named the Frank Palmer Auke Bay Ferry Terminal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.235

; renumbered in 2011.

Sec. 35.40.245.
Spc. Stephen “Max” Cavanaugh, Jr., Memorial Overpass.

The Dowling Road overpass at milepost 123.7 on the New Seward Highway is named the Spc. Stephen “Max” Cavanaugh, Jr., Memorial Overpass.

History.

(§ 1 ch 19 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.235

; renumbered in 2011.

Sec. 35.40.250.
Mark Hufford Trail.

The pathway parallel to the section of Eagle River Loop Road connecting Old Glenn Highway with North Parkview Terrace Loop is named the Mark Hufford Trail.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

35.40.235

; renumbered in 2011.

Sec. 35.40.255.
Marie Smith Jones Bridge.

The bridge over the Eyak River at mile 5.7 of the Copper River Highway is named the Marie Smith Jones Bridge after Marie Smith Jones.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.260.
Michael Dean Banta Bridge.

The Scott Glacier No. 1 bridge at mile 7.5 of the Copper River Highway is named the Michael Dean Banta Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.265.
Warren Allen Paulsen Bridge.

The Scott Glacier No. 3 bridge at mile 8.1 of the Copper River Highway is named the Warren Allen Paulsen Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.270.
David Alen Lape Bridge.

The Scott Glacier No. 5 bridge at mile 9.2 of the Copper River Highway is named the David Alen Lape Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.275.
David Henry Elisovsky Bridge.

The Scott Glacier No. 7 bridge at mile 9.7 of the Copper River Highway is named the David Henry Elisovsky Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.280.
Leonard F. Olson Bridge.

The Scott Glacier No. 9 bridge at mile 10.4 of the Copper River Highway is named the Leonard F. Olson Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.285.
Norman D. Osborne Bridge.

The Scott Glacier No. 11 bridge at mile 11 of the Copper River Highway is named the Norman D. Osborne Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.290.
Patrick A. Burchett Bridge.

The Sheridan Glacier East Channel bridge at mile 16.3 of the Copper River Highway is named the Patrick A. Burchett Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.295.
John W. Jones Bridge.

The Flag Point West bridge at mile 26.7 of the Copper River Highway is named the John W. Jones Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.300.
W. H. Mumby Bridge.

The Flag Point East bridge at mile 26.9 of the Copper River Highway is named the W. H. Mumby Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.305.
Matthew Anderson Bridge.

The Round Island bridge at mile 27.6 of the Copper River Highway is named the Matthew Anderson Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.310.
Lucian Platt Bridge.

Bridge number 334 at mile 34.6 of the Copper River Highway is named the Lucian Platt Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.315.
Steve Green Bridge.

Bridge number 339 at mile 36.2 of the Copper River Highway is named the Steve Green Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.320.
William M. Jones Bridge.

Bridge number 342 at mile 37 of the Copper River Highway is named the William M. Jones Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.325.
James Bennett Bridge.

Bridge number 345 at mile 37.9 of the Copper River Highway is named the James Bennett Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.330.
Minto-Al Wright Airport.

The state-owned airport at Minto, Alaska, also known as the Minto Al Wright Airport, is named the Minto-Al Wright Airport.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.335.
Koyukuk Station Veterans’ Airport.

The state-owned airport at Koyukuk, Alaska, known as the Koyukuk Airport, is named the Koyukuk Station Veterans’ Airport.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.340.
Greg Kruschek Avenue.

The state-owned Nome Bypass Road is named Greg Kruschek Avenue.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.345.
Harry Kito Bridge.

The bridge over Falls Creek at mile 10.4 of the Mitkof Highway is named the Harry Kito Bridge after Lance Corporal Donald Harry Kito.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.350.
Klawock-Frank Peratrovich Airport.

The state-owned airport at Klawock, known as the Klawock Airport, is named the Klawock-Frank Peratrovich Airport.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2012)

Sec. 35.40.355.
Nellie “the original Mrs. Claus” Miller Bridge.

The northbound Chena Flood Channel Bridge, bridge number 1364, is named the Nellie “the original Mrs. Claus” Miller Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 46 SLA 2013)

Sec. 35.40.356.
Con “the original Santa Claus” Miller Bridge.

The southbound Chena Flood Channel Bridge, bridge number 1866, is named the Con “the original Santa Claus” Miller Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 46 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

35.40.360

and renumbered in 2013.

Sec. 35.40.358.
Jim Andie and Robin Starrett Memorial Runway.

The runway at the state-owned airport in Akhiok is named the Jim Andie and Robin Starrett Memorial Runway.

History.

(§ 1 ch 70 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

35.40.355

and renumbered in 2013.

Sec. 35.40.360.
Kodiak Benny Benson State Airport.

The state-owned airport at Kodiak is named the Kodiak Benny Benson State Airport.

History.

(§ 1 ch 70 SLA 2013)

Sec. 35.40.362.
Walter J. Hickel Parkway.

Minnesota Drive and the portion of O’Malley Road in Anchorage from Minnesota Drive to the New Seward Highway are designated the Walter J. Hickel Parkway.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

35.40.355

and renumbered in 2013.

Sec. 35.40.365.
Lowell J. Ray Memorial Corridor.

That portion of East Blue Lupine Drive in Wasilla between Hyer Road and Hay Street is concurrently designated the Lowell J. Ray Memorial Corridor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 46 SLA 2013)

Sec. 35.40.370.
Father Andrew P. Kashevaroff State Library, Archives, and Museum Building, and Representative Richard Foster Reading Room.

The state library, archives, and museum building in Juneau is named the Father Andrew P. Kashevaroff State Library, Archives, and Museum Building.

The public reading room in the state library, archives, and museum building in Juneau is named the Representative Richard Foster Reading Room.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 2015)

Sec. 35.40.375.
Kenny and Patti Barber Shooting Range.

The shooting range located near Mud Lake on Maud Road between Palmer and Butte in the Knik River Public Use Area is named the Kenny and Patti Barber Shooting Range.

History.

(§ 1 ch 35 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For a transitional provision relating to the replacement of signs, see sec. 2, ch. 35, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 35, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, is effective October 4, 2016.

Sec. 35.40.385.
Scott Johnson Memorial Bridge.

Bridge number 506 over the Tok River at mile 1309 of the Alaska Highway is named the Scott Johnson Memorial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 3 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 3, SLA 2019, which enacted this section, took effect on August 15, 2019.

Sec. 35.40.395.
Trooper Gabe Rich Memorial Bridge.

Bridge number 392 over the Chatanika River at mile 38.8 of the Steese Highway is named the Trooper Gabe Rich Memorial Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 4 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 4, SLA 2019, which enacted this section, took effect on August 15, 2019.

Sec. 35.40.400.
irene Webber Bridge.

Bridge number 406 at mile 9.5 of the Copper River Highway is named the irene Webber Bridge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 21 SLA 2021)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 21, SLA 2021, which enacted this section, took effect on October 11, 2021.